Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1907
Medical radiographer, defined.

Medical radiographer means a person licensed pursuant to subsection (1) of section 38-1915 to practice medical radiography.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 645;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 7.